oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX Z N 33
SFX Z a isma a
SFX Z a ismaj a
SFX Z a ismajn a
SFX Z a isman a
SFX Z a isme a
SFX Z a ism’ a
SFX Z a ism' a
SFX Z a ismo a
SFX Z a ismoj a
SFX Z a ismojn a
SFX Z a ismon a
SFX Z 0 sma i
SFX Z 0 smaj i
SFX Z 0 smajn i
SFX Z 0 sman i
SFX Z 0 sme i
SFX Z 0 sm’ i
SFX Z 0 sm' i
SFX Z 0 smo i
SFX Z 0 smoj i
SFX Z 0 smojn i
SFX Z 0 smon i
SFX Z o isma o
SFX Z o ismaj o
SFX Z o ismajn o
SFX Z o isman o
SFX Z o isme o
SFX Z o ism’ o
SFX Z o ism' o
SFX Z o ismo o
SFX Z o ismoj o
SFX Z o ismojn o
SFX Z o ismon o
