oo/vimspell/eo.dic
abrahama/EZ
absinta/AOZ
absoluta/ACGOQZ
agnostika/AUZ
aktivi/OUVBZ
albino/FCZ
aneksi/ABOTYZ
anglikano/FZ
anglo/EFZ
anglokatoliko/FZ
animi/ARSOTZ
antisemito/FZ
antropocentra/AZ
antropofago/AOZ
aparta/ALCGQYZ
ariano/FZ
asketa/CFZ
aspekti/AOSVZ
atleto/FZ
aŭtokrata/FCZ
bahaa/ASZW
bajrona/ACZ
bismuto/AOZ
bonaparta/ASZ
bramana/AOZ
bromi/AOTZ
budao/ACOSWZ
ĉarlatani/ACOVBYZ
caro/FZ
centralizi/ATOZ
cinika/ACUZ
ciona/ASZ
civita/AOZ
dandi/ACVBZ
daŭo/AOSZ
denaska/AUZ
despota/AOZ
direkti/JLQSZ
dogma/AKBOZ
dulingva/ACZ
eklekta/ACOUZ
ekspansii/AOVBZ
ekvilibri/LSZ
ekzistada/ASZ
elektromagneta/AOZ
elito/ACOUWZ
energio/AOVZ
eroto/AOZ
eskapi/ALOSVZ
etera/AOZ
etno/COWYZ_^
eŭrazia/CEWZ
eŭropcentra/ASZ
evangelia/AOSZ
fabo/AOZ
fatala/AOSYZ
fenomena/AOZ
feŭdi/OUTZ
finvenki/TZ
formala/ABGYZ
ĝajno/AOZ
giganto/AOZ
gnostika/AOUZ
hegela/AWZ
hilela/ASZ
hinduo/FZ
hipnoti/AGOVZ
hitlera/AWZ
homarano/FZ
humora/ASOZ
ikso/AGOQSYZ
intelekto/OSZ
intuicio/OZ
iredenta/ASZ
jakobeno/FZ
jansena/AWZ
jezuita/AOJZ
ĵurnalo/AOSZ
kampado/JZ
kanibalo/FZ
karbonaro/FZ
kasta/AOZ
katoliko/CFKZ
kavalira/AOCYZ
kinina/AOZ
klitoro/AOZ
konsumi/AOQTBZY
kontingenca/AZ
kontraŭjuda/AZ
kosmopolita/AOCZ
kristano/CFKuZ
kritiki/BDOSTZ
kvakero/FZ
lakona/ACSZ
lamao/JZ
laringa/AOZ
libertina/ACOZ
limfata/AUZ
lirika/ASOUZ
luterana/AOZ
magneto/AOZ
maniĥea/AWZ
materiala/AOSZ
matriarka/ACZ
merkata/AOZ
mesia/AOZ
mikrobo/OZ
mistika/AUBOZ
monaĥo/JOZx
monarko/FSZ
monofizito/CFYZ
morfino/AOZ
mormono/FZ
multlingva/ACUZ
nazio/FZ
negativa/ACGOQSZ
nestoriano/FZ
nikotino/AOZ
nomadi/VZ
nomfetiĉo/AOSZ
nova/ABCMOUYZ
novkatoliko/MFZ
obskuranto/FZ
okulta/AZ
oportuno/ESZ
pagano/FYZ
paraziti/AOVZ
paroĥa/AOWZ
partikulara/AZ
patra/CVZ
patriarko/ACHOZ
patrina/CVZ
patrioto/FZ
pedanto/BCFYZ
platona/ACZ
plurdia/AZ
plurlingva/ACUZ
popoli/AOTWZ
pracelo/AOSZ
priskribi/AOSTZ
profeti/VYZ
progresi/ABGMOSVZ
protekti/ABLOTZ
protestanto/EFZ
prozelito/FZ
psiĥo/AOZ
psiko/AOZ
puritano/FZ
puro/MSUZ
rabeno/Z
racionala/EOZ
radikala/AUZ
raŭma/ASZ
realo/OSYZ^
regiono/ASOYZ
relativa/ACGOZ
reŭmata/AOZ
revizii/SOTZ
rita/AKOZ
romkatoliko/CFYZ
sadukeo/CFZ
scienco/OSUZ
senmorala/AGQZ
sensi/AOTYZ
skema/AOSZ
skeptika/ACUVZ
sklavi/CGQSVZ
skolti/VZ
sociala/AGSBZ
somnambulo/FZ
spirito/OSZ
strabi/AUVOZ
strukturo/BOZ
suncentra/AZ
talmuda/ASZ
tantro/AOZ
teo/AOHZ
tercentra/AOZ
tirani/ACOTZ
tolstoja/AWZ
totala/AZ
transformi/ALOQSTYZ
tutmonda/ACGQZ
universala/ACGYZ
vandalo/AOZ
vegetara/AWZ
vero/GQZ
voltera/AWZ
zoroastra/AWZ
